Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.081

Dairy technician's license—Application—Renewal—Fees.

(1) A dairy technician must obtain a dairy technician's license to conduct operations under this chapter. Such license shall be limited to those functions which the licensee has been found qualified to perform. Before issuing the license the director shall assess the applicant's qualifications and may test the applicant for the functions for which application has been made.

(2) Application for a license as a dairy technician shall be made upon forms provided by the director, and shall be filed with the department. The director may issue a temporary license to the applicant for such period as may be prescribed and stated in the license, not to exceed sixty days, but the license may not be renewed to extend the period beyond sixty days.

(3) The initial application and renewal for a dairy technician's license must be accompanied by a license fee of twenty-five dollars beginning July 1, 2015. All dairy technicians' licenses shall expire on December 31st of odd-numbered years.

(4) The initial application for any endorsement beyond a dairy technician's license must be accompanied by an endorsement fee of twenty-five dollars beginning July 1, 2015.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 27 s 3; 1999 c 291 s 5; 1994 c 143 s 206; 1963 c 58 s 6; 1961 c 11 s 15.32.580. Prior: 1943 c 90 s 4; 1927 c 192 s 8; 1923 c 27 s 7; 1919 c 192 s 26; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6189. Formerly RCW 15.32.580.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2015 3rd sp.s. c 27: See note following RCW 15.36.051.